Utah statutes.
31A-30-109.   Health benefit plan choices.
(1)  An individual carrier who offers individual coverage pursuant to Section
31A-30-108:
(a)  shall offer in the individual market under this chapter:
(i)  a choice of coverage that is at least equal to or greater than basic
coverage; and
(ii)  beginning January 1, 2010, the Utah NetCare Plan described in Subsection
31A-22-724(2); and
(b)  may offer a choice of coverage that:
(i)  costs less than or equal to the plan described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii);
and
(ii)  excludes some or all of the mandates described in Subsection
31A-22-724(3).
(2)  Beginning January 1, 2010, a small employer group carrier who offers
small employer group coverage pursuant to Section 31A-30-108:
(a)  shall offer in the small employer group market under this part:
(i)  a choice of coverage that is at least equal to or greater than basic
coverage; and
(ii)  coverage under the Utah NetCare Plan described in Section 31A-22-724;
and
(b)  may offer in the small employer group market under this part, a choice of
coverage that:
(i)  costs less than or equal to the coverage in Subsection (2)(a); and
(ii)  excludes some or all of the mandates described in Subsection
31A-22-724(3).
(3)  Nothing in this section limits the number of health benefit plans an
insurer may offer.
